California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(e) If the director determines within that 30-day period, based upon substantial evidence, that the written request is not complete, then the project may be authorized under Section 1652.

(f) The director shall immediately publish the determination pursuant to subdivision (d) in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(g) The project proponent shall submit the monitoring plan, monitoring report, and notice of completion to the department as required by the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its current equivalent at the time the project proponent submits the written request. The order or its current equivalent may include programmatic waivers or waste discharge requirements for small scale restoration projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 166.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

(a) The director’s approval of a habitat restoration or enhancement project pursuant to Section 1652 or 1653 shall be in lieu of any other permit, agreement, license, or other approval issued by the department, including, but not limited to, those issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of this division and Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3.

(b) This chapter shall not be construed as expanding the scope of projects requiring a permit, agreement, license, or other approval issued by the department.

(c) (1) If the director determines at any time that the
 project is no longer consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 1652 or subdivision (b) of Section 1653, as applicable, due to a material change between the project as submitted and the project being implemented or a change in the environmental circumstances in the area of implementation, the director shall notify the project proponent in writing and project implementation shall be suspended. Written notice from the director shall be delivered in person, by certified mail, or by electronic communication to the project proponent and shall specify the reasons why approval of the project was suspended. The approval for a project shall not be revoked pursuant to this subdivision unless it has first been suspended pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Within 30 days of receipt of a notice of suspension, the project proponent may file an objection with the director. Any objection shall be in writing and state the reasons why the project proponent objects
 to the suspension. The project proponent may provide additional environmental protection measures, design modifications, or other evidence that the project is consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 1652 or subdivision (b) of Section 1653, as applicable, and request that the notice of suspension be lifted and approval granted.

(3) The director shall revoke approval or lift the suspension of project approval within 30 days after receiving the project proponent’s objection pursuant to paragraph (2).

(d) Pursuant to Section 818.4 of the Government Code, the department and any other state agency exercising authority under this section shall not be liable with regard to any determination or authorization made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 167.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1655.

(a) The Habitat Restoration and Enhancement Account is hereby created in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(b) The department may enter into an agreement to accept funds from any public agency, person, business entity, or organization to achieve the purposes of this chapter. The department shall deposit any funds so received in the account. The funds received shall supplement existing resources for department administration and permitting of projects and programs included in this chapter.

(c) The department shall assess an application fee for a project submitted to the department pursuant to Section 1652 or 1653 consistent with the fees
 adopted by the department pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600), but the application fee shall not exceed the reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department relating to the project.

(d) Moneys in the account shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of administering and implementing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.

(a) The department shall submit a report no later than December 31, 2020, and an additional report no later than December 31, 2025, on the implementation of this chapter to the Legislature that shall include, but not be limited to, the number, type, and geographical distribution of approved projects, funding adequacy, and recommendations for changes and improvements in the program.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   (SB 716)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1657.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 735, Sec. 2.   (SB 716)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6.5, commencing with Section 1650.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.6. Voluntary Stream Restoration Property Owner Liability [1660. - 1660.]

1660.

(a) A qualifying state agency that funds a project to restore fish and wildlife habitats shall indemnify and hold harmless a real property owner who voluntarily allows their real property to be used for the project from civil liability for property damage or personal injury resulting from the project if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The project is authorized pursuant to Section 1602, 1652, or 1653.

(2) The project has received all approvals required under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Water Code or Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code.

(3) The liability arises from the construction, design specifications, surveying, planning, supervision, testing, or observation of construction related to the project.

(4) The real property owner does not perform, or retain any person or entity to perform, any construction, design specifications, surveying, planning, supervising, testing, or observation of construction related to the project.

(5) The project qualifies for an exemption from Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code as a small habitat restoration project under guidelines adopted by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to Section 21084 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) In the case of a project that does not meet the requirements prescribed in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), but meets all other requirements of subdivision (a), a qualifying state agency may indemnify and hold harmless a real property owner who voluntarily allows their real property to be used for the project from civil liability for property damage or personal injury resulting from the project.

(c) A qualifying state agency may develop any guidelines, forms, or contracts necessary to implement subdivision (a). Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of guidelines, forms, or contracts pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) A qualifying state agency
 may enter into an agreement with the United States government, or subdivision thereof, to share the cost of any civil liability incurred pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) (1) The costs of any civil liability incurred by a qualifying state agency pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be processed without delay and paid from the General Fund, and those costs shall be submitted as a claim against the qualifying state agency by the real property owner pursuant to Section 905.2 of the
 Government Code.

(2) The costs incurred by a qualifying state agency in investigating, settling, or defending against any claim pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be paid from the General Fund, in accordance with Section 965 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall not be construed to alter any existing rights, duties, or obligations arising from Title 12 (commencing with Section 2772) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying state agency” means the Natural Resources Agency and the California Environmental Protection Agency, as well as all boards, commissions, conservancies, and departments within the jurisdiction of those
 agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (AB 1906)   Effective September 15, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.7. Restoration Management Permit Act [1670. - 1678.]

1670.

This chapter shall be known as, and may be cited as, the Restoration Management Permit Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1671.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Baseline conditions” means existing native fish, wildlife, or plant population sizes, and the extent and quality of native fish, wildlife, or plant habitat in the area that would be affected by a qualifying restoration project. Fish, wildlife, plant, or habitat restoration activities required to satisfy avoidance, minimization, or mitigation requirements, or any combination of those requirements, for regulatory permits or approvals, regulatory enforcement actions or settlements, court orders, or other enforceable legal obligations shall be considered part of the baseline conditions, and those activities shall not count toward a substantial net benefit.

(b) “Management”
 means an activity, such as restoration of native fish, wildlife, plants, or their habitat and propagation, that will benefit, aid the conservation of, and assist in the recovery of a native fish, wildlife, or plant species.

(c) “Propagation” means activities that help sustain or increase native fish, wildlife, or plant populations for scientific, conservation, management, or educational purposes.

(d) (1) “Qualifying restoration project” means a management or propagation project that has the primary purpose of restoring native fish, wildlife, plants, or their habitat and that would result in a substantial net benefit to any one or more of the following, as determined by the department:

(A) Native fish.

(B) Native wildlife.

(C) Native plants.

(D) The habitat of native fish, native wildlife, or native plants.

(2) A qualifying restoration project may also have secondary or incidental benefits, including, but not limited to, flood risk reduction, recreation, or groundwater recharge.

(e) “Substantial net benefit” means a substantial, cumulative benefit to native fish, wildlife, plants, or their habitat, or any combination thereof, above baseline conditions that the department reasonably expects to result from a qualifying restoration project. In determining whether the department reasonably expects a qualifying restoration project to result in a substantial net benefit, the department shall consider the duration of the qualifying restoration project, all impacts on native fish,
 wildlife, plants, or their habitat, or any combination thereof, from the qualifying restoration project, and any other information the department determines to be relevant. A substantial net benefit shall assist either directly or indirectly in the recovery of native fish, wildlife, plants, or their habitat, or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

(a) The department may issue a restoration management permit to authorize take, possession, import, or export of any species or subspecies of fish, wildlife, or plant in association with a qualifying restoration project and to authorize any impacts to fish and wildlife resources as a result of activities otherwise subject to Section 1602, all pursuant to terms and conditions determined by the department.

(b) The department may authorize the take, possession, import, or export of any endangered species, threatened species, or candidate species designated pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 for management or propagation purposes, including scientific or educational purposes related to management or propagation, through a restoration
 management permit for a qualifying restoration project.

(c) The department may authorize the take, possession, import, or export of any fully protected bird, mammal, reptile, amphibian, or fish designated pursuant to Section 3511, 4700, 5050, or 5515 for management or propagation purposes, including scientific or educational purposes related to management or propagation, through a restoration management permit for a qualifying restoration project. The take, possession, import, or export of any fully protected bird, mammal, reptile, amphibian, or fish that is authorized through a restoration management permit for a qualifying restoration project shall not be subject to Section 3511, 4700, 5050, or 5515.

(d) The department may authorize the take, possession, import, or export of any plant species designated as rare pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) for management
 or propagation purposes, including scientific or educational purposes related to management or propagation, through a restoration management permit for a qualifying restoration project.

(e) The department may authorize the take, possession, import, or export of any fish, amphibian, reptile, mammal, bird, or the nests or eggs thereof, or any other form of plant or animal life not subject to subdivisions (b) through (d), inclusive, for management or propagation purposes, including scientific or educational purposes related to management or propagation, through a restoration management permit for a qualifying restoration project.

(f) If a qualifying restoration project includes the substantial diversion or obstruction of the natural flow of, or substantial change or use of any material from the bed, channel, or bank of, any river, stream, or lake and the department determines the
 activity may substantially adversely affect an existing fish or wildlife resource, the department may authorize those activities through a restoration management permit. The department shall include reasonable measures necessary to protect that resource in the restoration management permit for the qualifying restoration project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 74.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1673.

(a) The department may develop a permit application for restoration management permits. When applying for a restoration management permit, an applicant may propose protective measures contained within existing local, state, or federal agency authorizations for the applicant’s project or related documents to assist the department with developing restoration management permits that maximize consistency with other agency authorizations to the extent practicable.

(b) An application for a restoration management permit shall include all of the following:

(1) The appropriate application fee, if any, not to exceed the department’s reasonable costs, as determined by the department.

(2) The full name, mailing address, email address, and telephone number of the applicant. If the applicant is a corporation, firm, partnership, association, institution, or public or private agency, the name and address of the applicant, in addition to the name and address of the person responsible for the project.

(3) The project name and location, including latitude and longitude centroid in decimal degrees, and a project map.

(4) The estimated or desired project start and end dates.

(5) A detailed description of the project activities and desired outcomes, including, but not limited to, restoration plans and drawings.

(6) A detailed description of the area where the project will be carried
 out, including the project size, habitat types, and biological setting.

(7) A description of the department authorization or authorizations described in Section 1672 that the applicant is seeking for the project.

(8) A detailed description of baseline conditions for all areas that may be affected by the project.

(9) A detailed description of how the project satisfies the definition of qualifying restoration project set forth in Section 1671, including a detailed description of the expected benefit to native fish, wildlife, plants, or their habitat, or any combination thereof, above baseline conditions.

(10) If the applicant is seeking one or more take authorizations pursuant to Section 1672, the applicant shall provide all of the following:

(A) A list of species for which the applicant is seeking one or more take authorizations.

(B) A detailed description of the types of species take, including pursue, catch, capture, or kill, and the mechanisms by which species take would occur.

(C) An estimate of the number of individuals that would be taken, based on population numbers, or a proxy estimate based on the amount of suitable habitat, for each species for which the applicant is seeking one or more take authorizations.

(D) Species protection measures proposed by the applicant to minimize the impacts of the potential take, including any measures required or expected to be required in other approvals or permits.

(11) If the applicant
 is seeking an authorization pursuant to Section 1672 for activities that would otherwise be subject to Section 1602, the applicant shall provide all of the following:

(A) A detailed description of anticipated temporary and permanent impacts to any affected river, stream, or lake.

(B) Proposed feasible measures to protect any river, stream, or lake and to minimize project impacts, including any measures required or expected to be required in other approvals or permits.

(12) A copy of any other federal, state, or local permit or agreement already issued for the project.

(13) Copies of any final documents prepared for the project pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, including, but not limited to,
 environmental impact reports, mitigated negative declarations, negative declarations, notices of determination, and notices of exemption.

(14) Any other information the department determines to be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1674.

(a) The Restoration Management Permit Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(b) The department may establish a schedule of fees to be charged for all or a portion of the department’s costs relating to the administration of restoration management permits, not to exceed the department’s reasonable costs.

(c) Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Restoration Management Permit Program Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1675.

(a) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of any rules, instructions, or criteria pursuant to this chapter, but not to the development, adoption, or amendment of permit applications or guidance materials. All rules, instructions, criteria, permit applications, and guidance materials shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(b) The department shall require appropriate species protection, management, monitoring, and reporting measures in each restoration management permit issued by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1676.

(a) The department shall post on its internet website a list and description of every qualifying restoration project permitted by the department pursuant to this chapter. The description shall note the county or counties and the watershed or watersheds in which each project is located.

(b) On or before January 1, 2034, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature that evaluates the impacts and outcomes of this chapter on the pace and scale of restoration projects. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and shall include all of the following:

(1) A list and description of every qualifying restoration project permitted by the
 department pursuant to this chapter. The description shall note the county or counties and the watershed or watersheds in which each project is located.

(2) The number of days to process each permit, including a discussion of the reasons for any permitting delays.

(3) Identification of any qualifying restoration projects permitted by the department that also qualified for an exemption from the California Environmental Quality Act pursuant to Section 21080.56 of the Public Resources Code.

(4) An analysis of the impacts and outcomes of this chapter, including whether the implementation of this chapter helped to reduce permit processing times for restoration projects.

(5) Recommendations to improve the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1677.

The department shall not issue a restoration management permit for the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of isolated Delta conveyance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 1678.)
-------------------------------------------

1678.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.     Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6.7, commencing with Section 1670.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Conservation of Aquatic Resources [1700. - 1700.]

1700.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to encourage the conservation, maintenance, and utilization of the living resources of the ocean and other waters under the jurisdiction and influence of the state for the benefit of all the citizens of the state and to promote the development of local fisheries and distant-water fisheries based in California in harmony with international law respecting fishing and the conservation of the living resources of the oceans and other waters under the jurisdiction and influence of the state. This policy shall include all of the following objectives:

(a) The maintenance of sufficient populations of all species of aquatic organisms to insure their continued existence.

(b) The recognition of the importance of the aesthetic, educational, scientific, and nonextractive recreational uses of the living resources of the California Current.

(c) The maintenance of a sufficient resource to support a reasonable sport use, where a species is the object of sport fishing, taking into consideration the necessity of regulating individual sport fishery bag limits to the quantity that is sufficient to provide a satisfying sport.

(d) The growth of local commercial fisheries, consistent with aesthetic, educational, scientific, and recreational uses of such living resources, the utilization of unused resources, taking into consideration the necessity of regulating the catch within the limits of maximum sustainable yields, and the development of distant-water and overseas fishery enterprises.

(e) The management, on a basis of adequate scientific information promptly promulgated for public scrutiny, of the fisheries under the state’s jurisdiction, and the participation in the management of other fisheries in which California fishermen are engaged, with the objective of maximizing the sustained harvest.

(f) The development of commercial aquaculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.2. Trout Management [1725. - 1730.]

1725.

This act shall be known as the Trout and Steelhead Conservation and Management Planning Act of 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 847.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to do all of the following:

(a) Establish and maintain wild trout stocks, that, to the extent possible, should be native fish, in suitable waters of the state that are readily accessible to the general public as well as in those waters in remote areas.

(b) Establish angling regulations designed to maintain the wild trout fishery in those waters by natural reproduction.

(c) Discourage artificial planting of hatchery-raised hybrid and nonnative fish species in wild trout waters or in other areas that would adversely affect native aquatic and nonaquatic species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 6.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.1.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Hatchery production and stocking of California’s waters started over 140 years ago and is an enduring part of California’s history and attempts to steward its natural resources.

(b) Sustainable and adaptive management provides and improves recreational angling opportunities while protecting and
 maintaining native and wild trout fisheries, other species, and their mutual habitat.

(c) Management of the genetic diversity of California’s native trout species is imperative.

(d) Habitat restoration and the protection of cold water ecosystems are both of utmost importance to maintaining healthy wild trout populations, ensuring and promoting angler opportunities, and the sustainability of the inland trout fishery.

(e) The department shall seek to provide and enhance diverse recreational angling opportunities in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 7.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.4.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “trout” includes steelhead trout.

(b) The department, in administering its existing wild trout program, shall maintain an inventory of all California trout streams and lakes to determine the most suitable angling regulations for each stream or lake. The department shall determine for each stream or lake
 whether it should be managed as a wild trout fishery, or whether its management should involve the temporary planting of native trout species to supplement wild trout populations that is consistent with this chapter. In maintaining the inventory, the department shall give priority to those streams and lakes that have the highest biological potential for producing sizeable wild trout, which are inhabited by rare species, or where the quality of the fishery is threatened or endangered and take into consideration public use. The biological and physical inventories prepared and maintained for each stream, stream system, or lake shall include an assessment of the resource status, threats to the continued well-being of the fishery resource, the potential for fishery resource development, and recommendations, including necessary changes in the allowed take of trout, for the development of each stream or lake to its full capacity as a fishery, consistent with this chapter.

(c) This section does not provide any public entity or private party with any new or additional authority to affect the management of, or access to, any private land without the written consent of the owner. Privately owned lakes and ponds not open to the use of the general public shall be subject to this section only with the written consent of the owner. This chapter shall not be construed as authorizing or requiring special treatment of adjacent land areas or requiring land use restrictions. It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter should not diminish the existing authority of the department.

(d) The department shall make the inventory maintained pursuant to subdivision (b) publicly available on the department’s Internet Web site and the department shall continuously revise that inventory with the goal of reviewing every watershed once per decade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 8.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares that activities and programs mandated by this chapter are a continuation and perpetuation of the department’s existing wild trout program and other programs, and as such they shall be funded from existing budgetary resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 847.)
-------------------------------------------

1727.

(a) In order to provide for a diversity of available angling experiences throughout the state, it is the intent of the Legislature that the commission maintain the existing wild trout program, and as part of the program, develop additional wild trout waters in the more than 20,000 miles of trout streams and approximately 5,000 lakes containing trout in California.

(b) The department shall prepare a list of no less than 25 miles of stream or stream segments and at least one lake that it deems suitable for designation as wild trout waters. The department shall submit this list to the commission for its consideration at the regular October commission
 meeting.

(c) The commission may remove any stream or lake that it has designated as a wild trout fishery from the program at any time. If any of those waters are removed from the program, an equivalent amount of stream mileage or an equivalent size lake shall be added to the wild trout program.

(d) The department shall prepare and complete management plans for all wild trout waters not more than three years following their initial designation by the commission and update the management plan every five years following completion of the initial management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 275, Sec. 4.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1728.

(a) Every five years the department shall update the Strategic Plan for Trout Management published in November 2003 as necessary to guide the state’s trout management.

(b) The Strategic Plan for Trout Management shall be intended to ensure all of the following:

(1) Thriving and
 self-sustaining, wild and native trout populations throughout their historic ranges.

(2) Providing and improving angling opportunities for wild and native trout and other trout.

(3) Providing for the conservation of wild and native trout.

(4) Environmental sustainability and overall ecosystem and watershed health.

(c) The Strategic Plan for Trout Management shall be guided by all of the following considerations:

(1) Adaptively managing trout populations, including, but not limited to, stocking practices, to establish thriving and self-sustaining native and wild trout fisheries in wild trout waters and, where possible, in other waters.

(2) Increasing angler satisfaction.

(3) Ensuring appropriate age distribution of wild trout when appropriate.

(4) Establishing ecologically and environmentally sustainable hatchery and stocking practices for native trout, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Hatchery and stocking practices consistent with this chapter.

(B) Stocking plans shall include consideration of angler satisfaction and public use of, and access to, the waters for angling. This may include, but is not limited to, harvest and catch rates, including, but not limited to, trophy catch rates, the potential for high angler satisfaction, and where appropriate, put and grow stocking.

(C) Native trout
 shall be preferentially stocked when stocking is employed.

(D) Designing stocking plans to maintain and optimize the genetic diversity of trout populations and to be consistent with the direction provided by the strategic trout management team.

(E) Stocking plans for species listed in Section 7261 shall not exceed the documented biological carrying capacity of the water or ecosystem.

(5) Integrating stakeholder involvement into the planning process.

(6) Monitoring and evaluating management processes through angler surveys, public meetings coordinated with county fish and game commissions, or by other means.

(d) The department shall prepare and complete trout management plans consistent
 with the Strategic Plan for Trout Management for all wild trout waters not more than three years following their initial designation by the commission. The department shall update the management plan every five years or as necessary following completion of the initial management plan. The department shall prepare trout management plans for other waters consistent with the Strategic Plan for Trout Management as appropriate.

(e) Before implementation, the Strategic Plan for Trout Management produced by the department shall be reviewed by the strategic trout management team, the hatchery operations committee, and an ad hoc peer review committee convened by the department to ensure compliance with sound management practices, improved genetic diversity, and use of the best available scientific information.

(f) The Strategic Plan for Trout Management and plans completed pursuant to
 subdivision (d) shall be publicly available on the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 11.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.

(a) The department shall give priority to stocking native hatchery-produced species in California’s waters, where stocking is determined to be appropriate by the department. Stocking of hatchery-produced fish is not appropriate in all of California’s waters, including, but not limited to, stocking in California’s waters that would adversely affect species listed under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or the California Endangered
 Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3).

(b) Hatchery-produced trout shall be stocked to support sustainable angling recreation and promote angler access to trout fishing, including, but not limited to, urban fisheries.

(c) The department may provide outreach and educational materials to all anglers to promote awareness of environmental sustainability, ecosystem health, fish genetics, angling opportunities, and fish population management.

(d) Educational programs utilizing the hatcheries shall be encouraged.

(e) The department shall ensure that all trout stocked in waters of the state for recreational purposes are unable to reproduce through triploidy or other means, with the exception of fish planted into brood stock
 lakes, surplus brood stock planted according to fishery management decisions, fish planted to supplement waters that the department has determined to be genetically isolated from native fish populations, and native trout species produced for recovery and restoration within their native range.

(f) The department may develop, conduct, and respond to regular angler preference and satisfaction surveys. This is not a substitute for a preferred scientific data collection and monitoring program that would facilitate adaptive management of California’s inland trout fisheries.

(g) The department shall review angling regulations periodically and adjust those regulations to ensure consistency with the strategic plan described in Section 1728.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 12.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.

(a) By January 1, 2014, the department shall form an intradepartmental strategic trout management team to provide direction and oversee trout management statewide. Working under the framework of the Strategic Plan for Trout Management, the strategic trout management team shall direct and implement focused management and monitoring efforts for trout at the watershed level, in cooperation with local stakeholders.

(b) The strategic trout management team shall be responsible for developing basin management plans that are conservation based and are consistent throughout California for inland watersheds.

(c) The basin plans in subdivision (b) shall be reviewed by an ad hoc peer review committee, which may be convened under the guidance of the department’s Science Institute to ensure compliance with sound management practices and utilization of the best available scientific information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 13.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.3. Black Bass Conservation and Management [1740. - 1743.]

1740.

This chapter shall be known as the Black Bass Conservation and Management Act of 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1302, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to preserve and enhance black bass resources and to manage black bass populations to provide satisfactory recreational opportunities to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1302, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the black bass management program components specified in this chapter are a continuation of the department’s existing warmwater fisheries program, and, as such, shall be funded from existing department budgetary resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1302, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1743.

(a) The department’s black bass management program shall include, but not be limited to, the following components:
